Ohio, session 136, SB22.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 5747.08 and 5747.98 be amended 7
and section 5747.87 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as 8
follows: 9
Sec. 5747.08. An annual return with respect to the tax 10
imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code and each tax 11
imposed under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code shall be made by 12
every taxpayer for any taxable year for which the taxpayer is 13
liable for the tax imposed by that section or under that 14
chapter, unless the total credits allowed under division (E) of 15
section 5747.05 and divisions (F) and (G) of section 5747.055 of 16
the Revised Code for the year are equal to or exceed the tax 17
imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code, in which case no 18

S. B. No. 22 Page 2
As Introduced
return shall be required unless the taxpayer is liable for a tax 19
imposed pursuant to Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code. 20
(A) If an individual is deceased, any return or notice 21
required of that individual under this chapter shall be made and 22
filed by that decedent's executor, administrator, or other 23
person charged with the property of that decedent. 24
(B) If an individual is unable to make a return or notice 25
required by this chapter, the return or notice required of that 26
individual shall be made and filed by the individual's duly 27
authorized agent, guardian, conservator, fiduciary, or other 28
person charged with the care of the person or property of that 29
individual. 30
(C) Returns or notices required of an estate or a trust 31
shall be made and filed by the fiduciary of the estate or trust. 32
(D)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(1) 33
(b) of this section, any pass-through entity may file a single 34
return on behalf of one or more of the entity's investors other 35
than an investor that is a person subject to the tax imposed 36
under section 5733.06 of the Revised Code. The single return 37
shall set forth the name, address, and social security number or 38
other identifying number of each of those pass-through entity 39
investors and shall indicate the distributive share of each of 40
those pass-through entity investor's income taxable in this 41
state in accordance with sections 5747.20 to 5747.231 of the 42
Revised Code. Such pass-through entity investors for whom the 43
pass-through entity elects to file a single return are not 44
entitled to the exemption or credit provided for by sections 45
5747.02 and 5747.022 of the Revised Code; shall calculate the 46
tax before business credits at the highest rate of tax set forth 47
in section 5747.02 of the Revised Code for the taxable year for 48

S. B. No. 22 Page 3
As Introduced
which the return is filed; and are entitled to only their 49
distributive share of the business credits as defined in 50
division (D)(2) of this section. A single check drawn by the 51
pass-through entity shall accompany the return in full payment 52
of the tax due, as shown on the single return, for such 53
investors, other than investors who are persons subject to the 54
tax imposed under section 5733.06 of the Revised Code. 55
(b)(i) A pass-through entity shall not include in such a 56
single return any investor that is a trust to the extent that 57
any direct or indirect current, future, or contingent 58
beneficiary of the trust is a person subject to the tax imposed 59
under section 5733.06 of the Revised Code. 60
(ii) A pass-through entity shall not include in such a 61
single return any investor that is itself a pass-through entity 62
to the extent that any direct or indirect investor in the second 63
pass-through entity is a person subject to the tax imposed under 64
section 5733.06 of the Revised Code. 65
(c) Except as provided by division (L) of this section, 66
nothing in division (D) of this section precludes the tax 67
commissioner from requiring such investors to file the return 68
and make the payment of taxes and related interest, penalty, and 69
interest penalty required by this section or section 5747.02, 70
5747.09, or 5747.15 of the Revised Code. Nothing in division (D) 71
of this section precludes such an investor from filing the 72
annual return under this section, utilizing the refundable 73
credit equal to the investor's proportionate share of the tax 74
paid by the pass-through entity on behalf of the investor under 75
division (I) of this section, and making the payment of taxes 76
imposed under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. Nothing in 77
division (D) of this section shall be construed to provide to 78

S. B. No. 22 Page 4
As Introduced
such an investor or pass-through entity any additional deduction 79
or credit, other than the credit provided by division (I) of 80
this section, solely on account of the entity's filing a return 81
in accordance with this section. Such a pass-through entity also 82
shall make the filing and payment of estimated taxes on behalf 83
of the pass-through entity investors other than an investor that 84
is a person subject to the tax imposed under section 5733.06 of 85
the Revised Code. 86
(2) For the purposes of this section, "business credits" 87
means the credits listed in section 5747.98 of the Revised Code 88
excluding the following credits: 89
(a) The retirement income credit under division (B) of 90
section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 91
(b) The senior citizen credit under division (F) of 92
section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 93
(c) The lump sum distribution credit under division (G) of 94
section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 95
(d) The dependent care credit under section 5747.054 of 96
the Revised Code; 97
(e) The lump sum retirement income credit under division 98
(C) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 99
(f) The lump sum retirement income credit under division 100
(D) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 101
(g) The lump sum retirement income credit under division 102
(E) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; 103
(h) The credit for displaced workers who pay for job 104
training under section 5747.27 of the Revised Code; 105

S. B. No. 22 Page 5
As Introduced
(i) The twenty-dollar personal exemption credit under 106
section 5747.022 of the Revised Code; 107
(j) The joint filing credit under division (E) of section 108
5747.05 of the Revised Code; 109
(k) The nonresident credit under division (A) of section 110
5747.05 of the Revised Code; 111
(l) The credit for a resident's out-of-state income under 112
division (B) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code; 113
(m) The earned income tax credit under section 5747.71 of 114
the Revised Code; 115
(n) The lead abatement credit under section 5747.26 of the 116
Revised Code; 117
(o) The credit for education expenses under section 118
5747.72 of the Revised Code; 119
(p) The credit for tuition paid to a nonchartered 120
nonpublic school under section 5747.75 of the Revised Code; 121
(q) The credit for property taxes or rent-equivalent taxes 122
paid under section 5747.87 of the Revised Code. 123
(3) The election provided for under division (D) of this 124
section applies only to the taxable year for which the election 125
is made by the pass-through entity. Unless the tax commissioner 126
provides otherwise, this election, once made, is binding and 127
irrevocable for the taxable year for which the election is made. 128
Nothing in this division shall be construed to provide for any 129
deduction or credit that would not be allowable if a nonresident 130
pass-through entity investor were to file an annual return. 131
(4) If a pass-through entity makes the election provided 132

S. B. No. 22 Page 6
As Introduced
for under division (D) of this section, the pass-through entity 133
shall be liable for any additional taxes, interest, interest 134
penalty, or penalties imposed by this chapter if the tax 135
commissioner finds that the single return does not reflect the 136
correct tax due by the pass-through entity investors covered by 137
that return. Nothing in this division shall be construed to 138
limit or alter the liability, if any, imposed on pass-through 139
entity investors for unpaid or underpaid taxes, interest, 140
interest penalty, or penalties as a result of the pass-through 141
entity's making the election provided for under division (D) of 142
this section. For the purposes of division (D) of this section, 143
"correct tax due" means the tax that would have been paid by the 144
pass-through entity had the single return been filed in a manner 145
reflecting the commissioner's findings. Nothing in division (D) 146
of this section shall be construed to make or hold a pass- 147
through entity liable for tax attributable to a pass-through 148
entity investor's income from a source other than the pass- 149
through entity electing to file the single return. 150
(E) If a husband and wife file a joint federal income tax 151
return for a taxable year, they shall file a joint return under 152
this section for that taxable year, and their liabilities are 153
joint and several, but, if the federal income tax liability of 154
either spouse is determined on a separate federal income tax 155
return, they shall file separate returns under this section. 156
If either spouse is not required to file a federal income 157
tax return and either or both are required to file a return 158
pursuant to this chapter, they may elect to file separate or 159
joint returns, and, pursuant to that election, their liabilities 160
are separate or joint and several. If a husband and wife file 161
separate returns pursuant to this chapter, each must claim the 162
taxpayer's own exemption, but not both, as authorized under 163

S. B. No. 22 Page 7
As Introduced
section 5747.02 of the Revised Code on the taxpayer's own 164
return. 165
(F) Each return or notice required to be filed under this 166
section shall contain the signature of the taxpayer or the 167
taxpayer's duly authorized agent and of the person who prepared 168
the return for the taxpayer, and shall include the taxpayer's 169
social security number. Each return shall be verified by a 170
declaration under the penalties of perjury. The tax commissioner 171
shall prescribe the form that the signature and declaration 172
shall take. 173
(G) Each return or notice required to be filed under this 174
section shall be made and filed as required by section 5747.04 175
of the Revised Code, on or before the fifteenth day of April of 176
each year, on forms that the tax commissioner shall prescribe, 177
together with remittance made payable to the treasurer of state 178
in the combined amount of the state and all school district 179
income taxes shown to be due on the form. 180
Upon good cause shown, the commissioner may extend the 181
period for filing any notice or return required to be filed 182
under this section and may adopt rules relating to extensions. 183
If the extension results in an extension of time for the payment 184
of any state or school district income tax liability with 185
respect to which the return is filed, the taxpayer shall pay at 186
the time the tax liability is paid an amount of interest 187
computed at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of 188
the Revised Code on that liability from the time that payment is 189
due without extension to the time of actual payment. Except as 190
provided in section 5747.132 of the Revised Code, in addition to 191
all other interest charges and penalties, all taxes imposed 192
under this chapter or Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code and 193

S. B. No. 22 Page 8
As Introduced
remaining unpaid after they become due, except combined amounts 194
due of one dollar or less, bear interest at the rate per annum 195
prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code until paid or 196
until the day an assessment is issued under section 5747.13 of 197
the Revised Code, whichever occurs first. 198
If the commissioner considers it necessary in order to 199
ensure the payment of the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the 200
Revised Code or any tax imposed under Chapter 5748. of the 201
Revised Code, the commissioner may require returns and payments 202
to be made otherwise than as provided in this section. 203
To the extent that any provision in this division 204
conflicts with any provision in section 5747.026 of the Revised 205
Code, the provision in that section prevails. 206
(H) The amounts withheld pursuant to section 5747.06, 207
5747.062, 5747.063, 5747.064, 5747.065, or 5747.071 of the 208
Revised Code shall be allowed to the ultimate recipient of the 209
income as credits against payment of the appropriate taxes 210
imposed on the ultimate recipient by section 5747.02 and under 211
Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code. As used in this division, 212
"ultimate recipient" means the person who is required to report 213
income from which amounts are withheld pursuant to section 214
5747.06, 5747.062, 5747.063, 5747.064, 5747.065, or 5747.071 of 215
the Revised Code on the annual return required to be filed under 216
this section. 217
(I) If a pass-through entity elects to file a single 218
return under division (D) of this section and if any investor is 219
required to file the annual return and make the payment of taxes 220
required by this chapter on account of the investor's other 221
income that is not included in a single return filed by a pass- 222
through entity or any other investor elects to file the annual 223

S. B. No. 22 Page 9
As Introduced
return, the investor is entitled to a refundable credit equal to 224
the investor's proportionate share of the tax paid by the pass- 225
through entity on behalf of the investor. The investor shall 226
claim the credit for the investor's taxable year in which or 227
with which ends the taxable year of the pass-through entity. 228
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to allow any credit 229
provided in this chapter to be claimed more than once. For the 230
purpose of computing any interest, penalty, or interest penalty, 231
the investor shall be deemed to have paid the refundable credit 232
provided by this division on the day that the pass-through 233
entity paid the estimated tax or the tax giving rise to the 234
credit. 235
(J) The tax commissioner shall ensure that each return 236
required to be filed under this section includes a box that the 237
taxpayer may check to authorize a paid tax preparer who prepared 238
the return to communicate with the department of taxation about 239
matters pertaining to the return. The return or instructions 240
accompanying the return shall indicate that by checking the box 241
the taxpayer authorizes the department of taxation to contact 242
the preparer concerning questions that arise during the 243
processing of the return and authorizes the preparer only to 244
provide the department with information that is missing from the 245
return, to contact the department for information about the 246
processing of the return or the status of the taxpayer's refund 247
or payments, and to respond to notices about mathematical 248
errors, offsets, or return preparation that the taxpayer has 249
received from the department and has shown to the preparer. 250
(K) The tax commissioner shall permit individual taxpayers 251
to instruct the department of taxation to cause any refund of 252
overpaid taxes to be deposited directly into a checking account, 253
savings account, or an individual retirement account or 254

S. B. No. 22 Page 10
As Introduced
individual retirement annuity, or preexisting college savings 255
plan or program account offered by the Ohio tuition trust 256
authority under Chapter 3334. of the Revised Code, as designated 257
by the taxpayer, when the taxpayer files the annual return 258
required by this section electronically. 259
(L) If, for the taxable year, a nonresident or trust that 260
is the owner of an electing pass-through entity, as defined in 261
section 5747.38 of the Revised Code, does not have Ohio adjusted 262
gross income or, in the case of a trust, modified Ohio taxable 263
income other than from one or more electing pass-through 264
entities, the nonresident or trust shall not be required to file 265
an annual return under this section. Nothing in this division 266
precludes such an owner from filing the annual return under this 267
section, utilizing the refundable credit under section 5747.39 268
of the Revised Code equal to the owner's proportionate share of 269
the tax levied under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code and 270
paid by the electing pass-through entity, and making the payment 271
of taxes imposed under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. 272
(M) The tax commissioner may adopt rules to administer 273
this section. 274
Sec. 5747.87. (A) As used in this section : 275
(1) "Claim year" means, for individuals required to file 276
an income tax return pursuant to this chapter, the individual's 277
taxable year and, for all other individuals, the calendar year 278
preceding the year in which an application for credit is filed 279
under this section. 280
(2) "Eligible claimant" means an individual who has 281
occupied a homestead as an owner or lessee for at least six 282
months of the claim year and whose total household resources do 283

S. B. No. 22 Page 11
As Introduced
not exceed the threshold described in division (G) of this 284
section. 285
(3) "Gross rent" means the total rent paid during the 286
claim year by a lessee for the right to occupy a homestead 287
pursuant to an arm's length transaction with the property owner 288
or the owner's representative. 289
(4) "Qualifying homestead" means a dwelling, including a 290
manufactured or mobile home or a unit in a multiple-unit 291
dwelling or housing cooperative, that is located in this state, 292
that is not fully exempt from property taxation for the claim 293
year, and that meets one of the following requirements: 294
(a) The dwelling is owned by an individual who occupies 295
the dwelling as a primary residence and the true value of the 296
property, as listed on the tax list for the tax year ending in 297
the individual's claim year, does not exceed the home value 298
limit for that claim year; 299
(b) The dwelling is leased by an individual who occupies 300
the dwelling as a primary residence and the gross rent paid by 301
the lessee during the claim year did not exceed the product 302
obtained by multiplying the rent limit for that claim year by 303
the number of months the lessee occupied the dwelling as a 304
primary residence. 305
(5) "Household" means an individual and the individual's 306
spouse. 307
(6) "Income" means federal adjusted gross income, plus all 308
income excluded or exempt from the computation of federal 309
adjusted gross income, subtracted by all of the following: 310
(a) Up to three hundred dollars of gifts in cash or kind 311
from nongovernmental sources; 312

S. B. No. 22 Page 12
As Introduced
(b) Up to three hundred dollars of lottery, casino gaming, 313
or sports gaming winnings; 314
(c) Benefits provided under the supplemental nutrition 315
assistance program administered by the department of job and 316
family services pursuant to section 5101.54 of the Revised Code; 317
(d) Government payments made to a third party on behalf of 318
an individual; 319
(e) State or municipal tax refunds or tax credits; 320
(f) Any government grant that a property owner must use 321
for the rehabilitation of the owner's homestead; 322
(g) Stipends received by a person who is acting as a 323
foster grandparent under the foster grandparent program 324
authorized pursuant to 42 U.S.C 5011 or as a senior companion 325
pursuant to 42 U.S.C 5013; 326
(h) Amounts deducted from benefits provided under Title II 327
of the Social Security Act or from railroad retirement benefits 328
for premiums paid pursuant to the medicare program established 329
by Title XVIII of the Social Security Act; 330
(i) Contributions by an employer to life, accident, or 331
health insurance plans; 332
(j) Any money received from a low-income customer 333
assistance program, as defined in section 4928.01 of the Revised 334
Code; 335
(k) Loan proceeds; 336
(l) Inheritance or life insurance benefits from a spouse; 337
(m) Payments from a long-term care policy made to a 338
nursing home or other care facility; 339

S. B. No. 22 Page 13
As Introduced
(n) Accident or health insurance plan premiums paid by an 340
employer for a plan that covers a member of the household or the 341
member's family; 342
(o) Compensation for wrongful imprisonment. 343
(7) "Property tax due" means the property taxes or 344
manufactured home taxes charged and payable against the 345
homestead for the tax year ending in the eligible claimant's 346
claim year, after any reductions allowed under the Revised Code. 347
"Property tax due" does not include taxes that appeared on the 348
general tax list or manufactured home tax list for any preceding 349
tax year or any penalties, interest, or special assessments. 350
(8) "Rent-equivalent tax paid" means fifteen per cent of 351
gross rent. 352
(9) "Total household resources" means all income received 353
by all individuals of a household in the claim year while 354
members of the household, increased by the following deductions 355
from federal gross income: 356
(a) Any net operating loss; 357
(b) Any net rental or royalty loss; 358
(c) Any carryback or carryforward of a net operating loss. 359
(10) "Home value limit" means the median home value of 360
owner-occupied housing units in the county in this state that 361
has the highest such median home value according to the most 362
recent one-year data published in the American community survey. 363
(11) "Rent limit" means the median gross rent in the 364
county in this state that has the highest such median gross rent 365
according to the most recent one-year data published in the 366
American community survey. 367

S. B. No. 22 Page 14
As Introduced
(12) "American community survey" means the supplementary 368
statistics collected and published annually by the United States 369
census bureau in accordance with 13 U.S.C. 141 and 193. 370
(B) A refundable credit or rebate is allowed to eligible 371
claimants. In the case of eligible claimants required to file an 372
annual return under this chapter for the claim year, a credit is 373
allowed against the claimant's aggregate tax liability under 374
section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. For all other eligible 375
claimants, a rebate may be claimed on the form prescribed by the 376
tax commissioner pursuant to division (E) of this section. 377
Subject to division (C) of this section, the credit or rebate 378
shall equal one of the following: 379
(1) For eligible claimants who own the homestead for which 380
the claim is made, the amount by which the eligible claimant's 381
property tax due exceeds five per cent of the eligible 382
claimant's total household resources for that claim year. 383
(2) For eligible claimants who lease the homestead for 384
which the claim is made, the amount by which the eligible 385
claimant's rent-equivalent tax paid in the claim year exceeds 386
five per cent of the eligible claimant's total household 387
resources for that year. 388
(C) The credit or rebate allowed under this section for a 389
claim year shall not exceed a specified limit. For the first 390
claim year ending on or after the effective date of this 391
section, the limit equals one thousand dollars. For each 392
succeeding claim year, the limit shall be adjusted as provided 393
in division (G) of this section. 394
(D) For eligible claimants required to file an annual 395
return under this chapter for the claim year, the credit shall 396

S. B. No. 22 Page 15
As Introduced
be claimed in the order required under section 5747.98 of the 397
Revised Code. If the amount of the credit under this section 398
exceeds the aggregate amount of tax otherwise due under section 399
5747.02 of the Revised Code after deduction of all other credits 400
in that order, the taxpayer is entitled to a refund of the 401
excess. 402
(E)(1) The tax commissioner shall prescribe a form on 403
which eligible claimants who are not required to file an annual 404
return under this chapter may apply for the rebate authorized 405
under this section. Except as provided in division (E)(2) of 406
this section, such eligible claimants shall apply for the rebate 407
on that form after the first day of January following the end of 408
the claim year but before the fifteenth day of the fourth month 409
following the end of that claim year. 410
(2) An eligible claimant may request an extension of the 411
time to file a rebate application under division (E)(1) of this 412
section, on a form prescribed by the commissioner. Upon receipt 413
of such a request, the commissioner shall extend the due date 414
for filing the application to the fifteenth day of the tenth 415
month after the last day of the claim year. 416
(F)(1) The credit or rebate authorized under this section 417
shall be allowed to only one eligible claimant per homestead. 418
(2) Only the lessee shall claim a credit or rebate with 419
respect to property that is rented or leased as a homestead. 420
(G) For the first claim year ending on or after the 421
effective date of this section, an individual qualifies as an 422
eligible claimant only if the individual's total household 423
resources do not exceed sixty thousand dollars. For each 424
following claim year, the tax commissioner shall adjust this 425

S. B. No. 22 Page 16
As Introduced
total household resources limit and the credit or rebate limit 426
described in division (C) of this section by completing the 427
following calculations in September of each year: 428
(1) Determine the percentage increase in the gross 429
domestic product deflator determined by the bureau of economic 430
analysis of the United States department of commerce from the 431
first day of January of the preceding year to the last day of 432
December of the preceding year; 433
(2) Multiply that percentage increase by the total 434
household resources limit and the credit or rebate limit for the 435
current year; 436
(3) Add the resulting products to the respective limits 437
for the current year; 438
(4) Round the resulting sums to the nearest multiple of 439
one thousand dollars, in the case of the total household 440
resources limit, or nearest multiple of ten dollars, in the case 441
of the credit limit. 442
The adjusted amounts apply to claim years beginning in the 443
calendar year in which the adjustment is made and to claim years 444
beginning in each ensuing calendar year until a calendar year in 445
which a new adjustment is made pursuant to this division. The 446
commissioner shall not make a new adjustment in any calendar 447
year in which the amount resulting from the adjustment would be 448
less than the amount resulting from the adjustment in the 449
preceding calendar year. 450
(H) If a credit or rebate allowed under this section was 451
based on an amount of property tax due that differs from the 452
actual amount of such taxes paid by the eligible claimant for 453
the tax year ending in that claim year, the eligible claimant 454

S. B. No. 22 Page 17
As Introduced
shall file an annual return or application under division (E) of 455
this section for the ensuing claim year that reports the 456
difference. The claimant shall adjust the credit or rebate 457
claimed for the ensuing year by the amount of the difference. If 458
the claimant is not eligible for the credit or rebate for the 459
ensuing claim year, the claimant shall pay or may request 460
payment of the difference, as applicable. 461
(I) On or before the first day of November of each year, 462
the tax commissioner shall determine and publish a home value 463
limit and rent limit. The limits shall apply to claim years 464
beginning in the calendar year in which the limits are 465
determined. 466
Sec. 5747.98. (A) To provide a uniform procedure for 467
calculating a taxpayer's aggregate tax liability under section 468
5747.02 of the Revised Code, a taxpayer shall claim any credits 469
to which the taxpayer is entitled in the following order: 470
Either the retirement income credit under division (B) of 471
section 5747.055 of the Revised Code or the lump sum retirement 472
income credits under divisions (C), (D), and (E) of that 473
section; 474
Either the senior citizen credit under division (F) of 475
section 5747.055 of the Revised Code or the lump sum 476
distribution credit under division (G) of that section; 477
The dependent care credit under section 5747.054 of the 478
Revised Code; 479
The credit for displaced workers who pay for job training 480
under section 5747.27 of the Revised Code; 481
The campaign contribution credit under section 5747.29 of 482
the Revised Code; 483

S. B. No. 22 Page 18
As Introduced
The twenty-dollar personal exemption credit under section 484
5747.022 of the Revised Code; 485
The joint filing credit under division (G) (E) of section 486
5747.05 of the Revised Code; 487
The earned income credit under section 5747.71 of the 488
Revised Code; 489
The nonrefundable credit for education expenses under 490
section 5747.72 of the Revised Code; 491
The nonrefundable credit for donations to scholarship 492
granting organizations under section 5747.73 of the Revised 493
Code; 494
The nonrefundable credit for tuition paid to a 495
nonchartered nonpublic school under section 5747.75 of the 496
Revised Code; 497
The nonrefundable vocational job credit under section 498
5747.057 of the Revised Code; 499
The nonrefundable job retention credit under division (B) 500
of section 5747.058 of the Revised Code; 501
The enterprise zone credit under section 5709.66 of the 502
Revised Code; 503
The credit for beginning farmers who participate in a 504
financial management program under division (B) of section 505
5747.77 of the Revised Code; 506
The credit for commercial vehicle operator training 507
expenses under section 5747.82 of the Revised Code; 508
The nonrefundable welcome home Ohio (WHO) program credit 509
under section 122.633 of the Revised Code; 510

S. B. No. 22 Page 19
As Introduced
The credit for selling or renting agricultural assets to 511
beginning farmers under division (A) of section 5747.77 of the 512
Revised Code; 513
The credit for purchases of qualifying grape production 514
property under section 5747.28 of the Revised Code; 515
The small business investment credit under section 5747.81 516
of the Revised Code; 517
The nonrefundable lead abatement credit under section 518
5747.26 of the Revised Code; 519
The opportunity zone investment credit under section 520
122.84 of the Revised Code; 521
The enterprise zone credits under section 5709.65 of the 522
Revised Code; 523
The research and development credit under section 5747.331 524
of the Revised Code; 525
The credit for rehabilitating a historic building under 526
section 5747.76 of the Revised Code; 527
The nonrefundable Ohio low-income housing tax credit under 528
section 5747.83 of the Revised Code; 529
The nonrefundable affordable single-family home credit 530
under section 5747.84 of the Revised Code; 531
The nonresident credit under division (A) of section 532
5747.05 of the Revised Code; 533
The credit for a resident's out-of-state income under 534
division (B) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code; 535
The refundable motion picture and broadway theatrical 536
production credit under section 5747.66 of the Revised Code; 537

S. B. No. 22 Page 20
As Introduced
The refundable credit for film and theater capital 538
improvement projects under section 5747.67 of the Revised Code; 539
The refundable jobs creation credit or job retention 540
credit under division (A) of section 5747.058 of the Revised 541
Code; 542
The refundable credit for taxes paid by a qualifying 543
entity granted under section 5747.059 of the Revised Code; 544
The refundable credits for taxes paid by a qualifying 545
pass-through entity granted under division (I) of section 546
5747.08 of the Revised Code; 547
The refundable credit under section 5747.80 of the Revised 548
Code for losses on loans made to the Ohio venture capital 549
program under sections 150.01 to 150.10 of the Revised Code; 550
The refundable credit for rehabilitating a historic 551
building under section 5747.76 of the Revised Code; 552
The refundable credit under section 5747.39 of the Revised 553
Code for taxes levied under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code 554
paid by an electing pass-through entity; 555
The refundable credit for property taxes or rent- 556
equivalent taxes paid under section 5747.87 of the Revised Code. 557
(B) For any credit, except the refundable credits 558
enumerated in this section and the credit granted under division 559
(H) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code, the amount of the 560
credit for a taxable year shall not exceed the taxpayer's 561
aggregate amount of tax due under section 5747.02 of the Revised 562
Code, after allowing for any other credit that precedes it in 563
the order required under this section. Any excess amount of a 564
particular credit may be carried forward if authorized under the 565

S. B. No. 22 Page 21
As Introduced
section creating that credit. Nothing in this chapter shall be 566
construed to allow a taxpayer to claim, directly or indirectly, 567
a credit more than once for a taxable year. 568
Section 2. That existing sections 5747.08 and 5747.98 of 569
the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 570
Section 3. The amendment or enactment by this act of 571
sections 5747.08, 5747.87, and 5747.98 of the Revised Code 572
applies to claim years, as defined in section 5747.87 of the 573
Revised Code, as enacted by this act, ending on or after the 574
effective date of that amendment or enactment. 575